Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.38.010

Local organization.

A code city may participate in the creation of local organizations for emergency services, provide for mutual aid, and exercise all of the powers and privileges and perform all of the functions and duties, and the officers and employees thereof shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as any city of any class, and the employees thereof, have in connection with emergency services as provided in chapter 38.52 RCW in the manner provided by said chapters or by general law.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.38.010.]